Illinois, session 104th, SB1696.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Temporary Immunity for Child Welfare Agencies Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to ensure 7that child welfare agencies in the State can provide for the 8uninterrupted delivery of child welfare services for youth in 9foster care. 10    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Child welfare agency" means a public or private child 12care facility that receives a child or children for the 13purpose of placing or arranging for the placement or free care 14of the child or children in foster family homes, unlicensed 15pre-adoptive and adoptive homes, adoption-only homes, or other 16facilities for child care apart from the custody of the 17child's or children's parents. The term "child welfare agency" 18includes (i) all agencies established and maintained by a 19municipality or other political subdivision of the State to 20protect, guard, train, or care for children outside their own 21homes; and (ii) all agencies, persons, groups of persons, 22organizations, corporations, institutions, centers, or group   SB1696- 2 -LRB104 09536 JRC 19599 b1providing adoption services. It does not include any circuit 2court, appointed juvenile probation officer, or youth 3counselor of the court who receive and place children under an 4order of the court.5    "Willful and wanton conduct" as used in this Act means a 6course of action that shows actual or deliberate intention to 7cause harm or which, if not intentional, shows an utter 8indifference to or conscious disregard for the safety of 9others or their property. This definition applies in any case 10in which a "willful and wanton" exception is incorporated into 11immunity under this Act. 12    Section 15. Child welfare agency limited immunity. 13    (a) For 2 years after the effective date of this Act, a 14child welfare agency acting within the scope of its 15contractual obligations to provide foster care services to 16children and families of Illinois has limited immunity from 17civil liability, including civil damages.18    (b) A child welfare agency is not liable for its acts or 19omissions in the execution of its contractual obligations with 20the Department of Children and Family Services unless the act 21or omission constitutes willful and wanton conduct.22    (c) The limited immunity granted under this Act extends to 23a child welfare agency's employees, volunteers, and agents 24acting within their employment unless the act or omission 25constitutes willful and wanton conduct.   SB1696- 3 -LRB104 09536 JRC 19599 b1    Section 20. Child welfare agency compliance.2    (a) For the immunity granted under this Act to apply, the 3child welfare agency must be a licensed child welfare agency 4as defined in the Children and Family Services Act and in good 5standing with the State.6    (b) Nothing in this Act relieves the child welfare agency 7of the protections or obligations established under the 8Children and Family Services Act. 9    Section 25. Inspector General oversight and authority.10    (a) The Inspector General appointed under Section 35.5 of 11the Children and Family Services Act shall use its authority 12under that Act to conduct investigations into allegations of 13or incidents of possible misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, 14or violations of rules, procedures, or laws by any child 15welfare agency while this Act is effective.16    (b) The Inspector General retains all authority granted 17under the Children and Family Services Act to investigate 18allegations made against any child welfare agency or its 19employees while this Act is effective, including, but not 20limited to, imposing sanctions for violations. 21    Section 30. Child Welfare Agency Liability Task Force.22    (a) The Child Welfare Agency Liability Task Force is 23created. The mission of the Child Welfare Agency Liability   SB1696- 4 -LRB104 09536 JRC 19599 b1Task Force is to develop and recommend a permanent solution to 2address the unavailability of liability insurance for child 3welfare agencies in the State.4    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:5        (1) The Director of Department of Insurance or the 6    Director's designee, who shall serve as chair;7        (2) One member appointed by the Senate President;8        (3) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 9    Senate;10        (4) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House;11        (5) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 12    House;13        (6) The Director of Children and Family Services or 14    the Director's designee;15        (7) One representative from the insurance industry 16    with expertise in liability coverage;17        (8) One representative from a statewide organization 18    that advocates on behalf of Illinois attorneys; and19        (9) One representative from a statewide organization 20    that advocates on behalf of the community-based services 21    for children and families.22    Initial appointments to the Task Force shall be made no 23more than 3 months after the effective date of this Act. If a 24vacancy occurs in the Task Force membership, the vacancy shall 25be filled in the same manner as the original appointment until 26the Task Force is dissolved. Task Force members serve without   SB1696- 5 -LRB104 09536 JRC 19599 b1compensation.2    (c) The Task Force shall hold its first meeting within 30 3days after all Task Force members have been appointed and then 4on a monthly basis thereafter.5    (d) The Task Force shall evaluate and develop a long-term 6solution to address the unavailability of liability insurance 7for child welfare agencies in the State.8    (e) The Task Force shall submit its first report to the 9General Assembly no later than December 31, 2026. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.